Washington statutes.
RCW 30B.10.240

Statute of limitations.

(1) An action seeking any remedy under RCW 30B.10.070, 30B.10.080, or 30B.10.190 shall commence no later than five years after the cause of action accrued.

(2) A cause of action under this section is deemed to have accrued at the later of the following events:

(a) The occurrence of the act or omission;

(b) When the department discovers or should have discovered that the act or omission has occurred;

(c) When the department discovers or should have discovered that the act or omission has negatively impacted the capital status or other element of safety or soundness of a state trust company or out-of-state trust company doing business in Washington state; or

(d) Where an act or omission is part of a pattern or practice, upon the occurrence of the most recent act or omission comprising the pattern or practice. A cause of action under this subsection may include all acts or omissions comprising the pattern or practice if the cause of action is timely as to the most recent act or omission.

[ 2019 c 389 s 33.]